src/fst/morphology/incoming/content.lexd
LEXICON Content
: a : <@P.LEX.a0@> <@R.LEX.a0@>  # The letter A in Visayan is pronounced as in Spanish !{a}
: a : <@P.LEX.a1@> <@R.LEX.a1@>  # Ah !{a}
: a ́-a <@P.LEX.á-a0@> <@R.LEX.á-a0@>  # An exclamation of sorrow !{á-a}
: a -á%^K <@P.LEX.a-á%^K0@> <@R.LEX.a-á%^K0@>  # Pooh !{a-â}
: a bá <@P.LEX.abá0@> <@R.LEX.abá0@>  # Ah !{abá}
: a bá%^K <@P.LEX.abá%^K0@> <@R.LEX.abá%^K0@>  # (B) Oh !{abâ}
: a bá <@P.LEX.abá1@> <@R.LEX.abá1@>  # (B) The back !{abá}
: a bá-a <@P.LEX.abá-a0@> <@R.LEX.abá-a0@>  # Ah !{abá-a, abáa}
: a ́b-ab <@P.LEX.áb-ab0@> <@R.LEX.áb-ab0@>  # To eat or bite off a piece: to undermine and carry off !{áb-ab}
: a bád <@P.LEX.abád0@> <@R.LEX.abád0@>  # (Sp. abad) Abbot !{abád}
: a badésa <@P.LEX.abadésa0@> <@R.LEX.abadésa0@>  # (Sp. abadesa) Abbess !{abadésa}
: a badíya <@P.LEX.abadíya0@> <@R.LEX.abadíya0@>  # (Sp. abadia) Abbey !{abadíya}
: a bága <@P.LEX.abága0@> <@R.LEX.abága0@>  # The shoulder !{abága}
: a bagánhan <@P.LEX.abagánhan0@> <@R.LEX.abagánhan0@>  # One with strong or broad shoulders !{abagánhan}
: a ́bak <@P.LEX.ábak0@> <@R.LEX.ábak0@>  # To follow in quick succession !{ábak}
: a baká <@P.LEX.abaká0@> <@R.LEX.abaká0@>  # (Sp. abaca) The hemp-plant !{abaká}
: a bák-abák <@P.LEX.abák-abák0@> <@R.LEX.abák-abák0@>  # Dim !{abák-abák}
: a bakahán <@P.LEX.abakahán0@> <@R.LEX.abakahán0@>  # One who has plenty of— !{abakahán}
: a bákan <@P.LEX.abákan0@> <@R.LEX.abákan0@>  # A small fish of a reddish colour !{abákan}
: a ́ban <@P.LEX.ában0@> <@R.LEX.ában0@>  # To finish !{ában}
: a ́bang <@P.LEX.ábang0@> <@R.LEX.ábang0@>  # To take within range or sweep (of fire !{ábang}
: a báng <@P.LEX.abáng0@> <@R.LEX.abáng0@>  # (B) Greediness !{abáng}
: a báng-ábang <@P.LEX.abáng-ábang0@> <@R.LEX.abáng-ábang0@>  # A tree well known for its beautiful leaves and large pods !{abáng-ábang}
: a báng-ábang <@P.LEX.abáng-ábang1@> <@R.LEX.abáng-ábang1@>  # (B) To help !{abáng-ábang}
: a baníko <@P.LEX.abaníko0@> <@R.LEX.abaníko0@>  # (Sp. abanico) Fan !{abaníko}
: a báno <@P.LEX.abáno0@> <@R.LEX.abáno0@>  # (Sp. habano) A cigar !{abáno}
: a bansáda <@P.LEX.abansáda0@> <@R.LEX.abansáda0@>  # (Sp. avanzada) Exposed !{abansáda}
: a báo <@P.LEX.abáo0@> <@R.LEX.abáo0@>  # An expression of joy !{abáo}
: a ́bas <@P.LEX.ábas0@> <@R.LEX.ábas0@>  # (Sp. haba) A kind of beans !{ábas}
: a ́bat <@P.LEX.ábat0@> <@R.LEX.ábat0@>  # To follow !{ábat}
: a bát-ábat <@P.LEX.abát-ábat0@> <@R.LEX.abát-ábat0@>  # Dim !{abát-ábat}
: a bát-abát <@P.LEX.abát-abát0@> <@R.LEX.abát-abát0@>  # To follow closely without going beyond !{abát-abát}
: a báw <@P.LEX.abáw0@> <@R.LEX.abáw0@>  # See abáo !{abáw}
: a báy <@P.LEX.abáy0@> <@R.LEX.abáy0@>  # (B) To join !{abáy}
: a báy-abáy <@P.LEX.abáy-abáy0@> <@R.LEX.abáy-abáy0@>  # Dim !{abáy-abáy}
: a báyan <@P.LEX.abáyan0@> <@R.LEX.abáyan0@>  # Liable to fall under a spell by which a benefit is changed into its opposite evil !{abáyan}
: a ́bdan <@P.LEX.ábdan0@> <@R.LEX.ábdan0@>  # See abúd—​to hem !{ábdan}
: a belyána <@P.LEX.abelyána0@> <@R.LEX.abelyána0@>  # (Sp. avellana) Hazel-nut !{abelyána}
: a ́bhan <@P.LEX.ábhan0@> <@R.LEX.ábhan0@>  # Paábhi !{ábhan}
: a ́bi <@P.LEX.ábi0@> <@R.LEX.ábi0@>  # For instance !{ábi}
: a bí-ábi <@P.LEX.abí-ábi0@> <@R.LEX.abí-ábi0@>  # Greetings !{abí-ábi}
: a ́bian <@P.LEX.ábian0@> <@R.LEX.ábian0@>  # Friend !{ábian}
: a biár <@P.LEX.abiár0@> <@R.LEX.abiár0@>  # (Sp. aviar) To provide for a journey !{abiár}
: a bibár <@P.LEX.abibár0@> <@R.LEX.abibár0@>  # (Sp. avivar) To urge !{abibár}
: a bierto <@P.LEX.abierto0@> <@R.LEX.abierto0@>  # (Sp. abierto) Open !{abierto}
: a bíl <@P.LEX.abíl0@> <@R.LEX.abíl0@>  # (Sp. hábil) Capable !{abíl}
: a bíl-abíl <@P.LEX.abíl-abíl0@> <@R.LEX.abíl-abíl0@>  # Dim !{abíl-abíl}
: a bíl-abilón <@P.LEX.abíl-abilón0@> <@R.LEX.abíl-abilón0@>  # See abíl-abíl id !{abíl-abilón}
: a bilay <@P.LEX.abilay0@> <@R.LEX.abilay0@>  # Shawl !{abilay}
: a bilidád <@P.LEX.abilidád0@> <@R.LEX.abilidád0@>  # (Sp. habilidad) Ability !{abilidád}
: a ́biog <@P.LEX.ábiog0@> <@R.LEX.ábiog0@>  # To move to and fro !{ábiog}
: a biogán <@P.LEX.abiogán0@> <@R.LEX.abiogán0@>  # A swing !{abiogán}
: a bír <@P.LEX.abír0@> <@R.LEX.abír0@>  # (Sp. haber) Property !{abír}
: a bír <@P.LEX.abír1@> <@R.LEX.abír1@>  # (Sp. a ver) Let us see !{abír}
: a bisár <@P.LEX.abisár0@> <@R.LEX.abisár0@>  # (Sp. avisar) To advise !{abisár}
: a bíso <@P.LEX.abíso0@> <@R.LEX.abíso0@>  # (Sp. aviso) Notice !{abíso}
: a bitsuélas <@P.LEX.abitsuélas0@> <@R.LEX.abitsuélas0@>  # (Sp. habichuela) French-beans !{abitsuélas}
: a ́blang <@P.LEX.áblang0@> <@R.LEX.áblang0@>  # (B) Width !{áblang}
: a ́blaw <@P.LEX.áblaw0@> <@R.LEX.áblaw0@>  # (B) Affability !{áblaw}
: a bláy <@P.LEX.abláy0@> <@R.LEX.abláy0@>  # (B) Shawl !{abláy}
: a bó%^K <@P.LEX.abó%^K0@> <@R.LEX.abó%^K0@>  # (B) An exclamation denoting aversion !{abô}
: a bó <@P.LEX.abó0@> <@R.LEX.abó0@>  # Ash !{abó}
: a ́bo <@P.LEX.ábo0@> <@R.LEX.ábo0@>  # A kind of small fish !{ábo}
: a bó-abo <@P.LEX.abó-abo0@> <@R.LEX.abó-abo0@>  # Dim !{abó-abo}
: a bó-ábo <@P.LEX.abó-ábo0@> <@R.LEX.abó-ábo0@>  # Dim !{abó-ábo}
: a bó-abóhon <@P.LEX.abó-abóhon0@> <@R.LEX.abó-abóhon0@>  # Ash-coloured !{abó-abóhon}
: a ́bog <@P.LEX.ábog0@> <@R.LEX.ábog0@>  # See ábiog !{ábog}
: a bogádo <@P.LEX.abogádo0@> <@R.LEX.abogádo0@>  # (Sp. abogado) Lawyer !{abogádo}
: a bohán <@P.LEX.abohán0@> <@R.LEX.abohán0@>  # Fire-place !{abohán}
: a bohón <@P.LEX.abohón0@> <@R.LEX.abohón0@>  # Ashy !{abohón}
: a bokádo <@P.LEX.abokádo0@> <@R.LEX.abokádo0@>  # A kind of orange-tree !{abokádo}
: a bonár <@P.LEX.abonár0@> <@R.LEX.abonár0@>  # (Sp. abonar) To advance !{abonár}
: a ́bong <@P.LEX.ábong0@> <@R.LEX.ábong0@>  # On the windward side !{ábong}
: a bóngho <@P.LEX.abóngho0@> <@R.LEX.abóngho0@>  # Anger !{abóngho}
: a bóno <@P.LEX.abóno0@> <@R.LEX.abóno0@>  # (Sp. abono) Manure !{abóno}
: a borído <@P.LEX.aborído0@> <@R.LEX.aborído0@>  # (Sp. aburrido) Worried !{aborído}
: a bórto <@P.LEX.abórto0@> <@R.LEX.abórto0@>  # (Sp. abórto) Abortion !{abórto}
: a bóy <@P.LEX.abóy0@> <@R.LEX.abóy0@>  # Bent !{abóy}
: a bóy-abóy <@P.LEX.abóy-abóy0@> <@R.LEX.abóy-abóy0@>  # (B) Dim !{abóy-abóy}
: a bóyon <@P.LEX.abóyon0@> <@R.LEX.abóyon0@>  # (B) Abóyon without prefix is not in use !{abóyon}
: a bráso <@P.LEX.abráso0@> <@R.LEX.abráso0@>  # (Sp. abrazo) Embrace !{abráso}
: a ́bri <@P.LEX.ábri0@> <@R.LEX.ábri0@>  # (Sp. abrir) To unlock !{ábri}
: a brigána <@P.LEX.abrigána0@> <@R.LEX.abrigána0@>  # (Sp. abrir !{abrigána}
: a brígo <@P.LEX.abrígo0@> <@R.LEX.abrígo0@>  # (Sp. abrigo) Shawl !{abrígo}
: a bríl <@P.LEX.abríl0@> <@R.LEX.abríl0@>  # (Sp. abril) April !{abríl}
: a brilátas <@P.LEX.abrilátas0@> <@R.LEX.abrilátas0@>  # (Sp. abrir !{abrilátas}
: a bsolbér <@P.LEX.absolbér0@> <@R.LEX.absolbér0@>  # (Sp. absolver) To absolve !{absolbér}
: a bsolusyón <@P.LEX.absolusyón0@> <@R.LEX.absolusyón0@>  # (Sp. absolución) Absolution !{absolusyón}
: a bsuélto <@P.LEX.absuélto0@> <@R.LEX.absuélto0@>  # (Sp. absuelto) Absolved !{absuélto}
: a bsúrdo <@P.LEX.absúrdo0@> <@R.LEX.absúrdo0@>  # (Sp. absurdo) Absurdity !{absúrdo}
: a ́btan <@P.LEX.ábtan0@> <@R.LEX.ábtan0@>  # For abután from abút—​to arrive !{ábtan}
: a ́btik <@P.LEX.ábtik0@> <@R.LEX.ábtik0@>  # Dexterity !{ábtik}
: a ́bud <@P.LEX.ábud0@> <@R.LEX.ábud0@>  # A plant with medicinal properties !{ábud}
: a búd <@P.LEX.abúd0@> <@R.LEX.abúd0@>  # (B) Hem !{abúd}
: a buéla <@P.LEX.abuéla0@> <@R.LEX.abuéla0@>  # (Sp. abuela) Grandmother !{abuéla}
: a buélo <@P.LEX.abuélo0@> <@R.LEX.abuélo0@>  # (Sp. abuelo) Grandfather !{abuélo}
: a búkan <@P.LEX.abúkan0@> <@R.LEX.abúkan0@>  # A kind of sea-shell !{abúkan}
: a búkay <@P.LEX.abúkay0@> <@R.LEX.abúkay0@>  # To ruffle !{abúkay}
: a búnda <@P.LEX.abúnda0@> <@R.LEX.abúnda0@>  # (Sp. abundar !{abúnda}
: a busár <@P.LEX.abusár0@> <@R.LEX.abusár0@>  # (Sp. abusar) Misuse !{abusár}
: a búso <@P.LEX.abúso0@> <@R.LEX.abúso0@>  # (Sp. abuso) Abuse !{abúso}
: a bút <@P.LEX.abút0@> <@R.LEX.abút0@>  # To arrive !{abút}
: a ́but <@P.LEX.ábut0@> <@R.LEX.ábut0@>  # To reach !{ábut}
: a bút-abút <@P.LEX.abút-abút0@> <@R.LEX.abút-abút0@>  # Freq !{abút-abút}
: a bút-ábut <@P.LEX.abút-ábut0@> <@R.LEX.abút-ábut0@>  # Freq !{abút-ábut}
: a ́bwa%^K <@P.LEX.ábwa%^K0@> <@R.LEX.ábwa%^K0@>  # To make or scramble for !{ábwà}
: a ́byan <@P.LEX.ábyan0@> <@R.LEX.ábyan0@>  # See ábian id !{ábyan}
: a byérto <@P.LEX.abyérto0@> <@R.LEX.abyérto0@>  # See abiérto !{abyérto, ábyog, abyogán}
: a ́da <@P.LEX.áda0@> <@R.LEX.áda0@>  # (Sp. háda) Fairy !{áda}
: a dá-áda <@P.LEX.adá-áda0@> <@R.LEX.adá-áda0@>  # To receive in trust !{adá-áda}
: a ́d-ad <@P.LEX.ád-ad0@> <@R.LEX.ád-ad0@>  # To cut in thin slices !{ád-ad}
: a ́d-ad <@P.LEX.ád-ad1@> <@R.LEX.ád-ad1@>  # To reject food !{ád-ad}
: a ́d-ad <@P.LEX.ád-ad2@> <@R.LEX.ád-ad2@>  # To gossip !{ád-ad}
: a d-adán <@P.LEX.ad-adán0@> <@R.LEX.ad-adán0@>  # A slicer !{ad-adán}
: a dárna <@P.LEX.adárna0@> <@R.LEX.adárna0@>  # A singing bird !{adárna}
: a ́dat <@P.LEX.ádat0@> <@R.LEX.ádat0@>  # Acridity !{ádat}
: a delantádo <@P.LEX.adelantádo0@> <@R.LEX.adelantádo0@>  # (Sp. adelantado) Progressive !{adelantádo}
: a delantár <@P.LEX.adelantár0@> <@R.LEX.adelantár0@>  # (Sp. adelantar) To promote !{adelantár}
: a délpa <@P.LEX.adélpa0@> <@R.LEX.adélpa0@>  # (Sp. adelfa) The rose-bay !{adélpa}
: a demás <@P.LEX.además0@> <@R.LEX.además0@>  # (Sp. ademas) Moreover !{además}
: a ́dgaw <@P.LEX.ádgaw0@> <@R.LEX.ádgaw0@>  # A tree !{ádgaw}
: a dí <@P.LEX.adí0@> <@R.LEX.adí0@>  # Give me !{adí}
: a díkdik <@P.LEX.adíkdik0@> <@R.LEX.adíkdik0@>  # Dandruff !{adíkdik}
: a dikdikón <@P.LEX.adikdikón0@> <@R.LEX.adikdikón0@>  # Full of dandruff !{adikdikón}
: a díng <@P.LEX.adíng0@> <@R.LEX.adíng0@>  # A term of endearment used in addressing that class of effeminates known as “agî”: Deary !{adíng}
: a dióng <@P.LEX.adióng0@> <@R.LEX.adióng0@>  # A large ship !{adióng}
: a diós <@P.LEX.adiós0@> <@R.LEX.adiós0@>  # (Sp. adios) God bless you !{adiós}
: a disyón <@P.LEX.adisyón0@> <@R.LEX.adisyón0@>  # (Sp. adicion) Addition !{adisyón}
: a ́dlaw <@P.LEX.ádlaw0@> <@R.LEX.ádlaw0@>  # Sun !{ádlaw}
: a dláw-ádlawadláwádlaw <@P.LEX.adláw-ádlawadláwádlaw0@> <@R.LEX.adláw-ádlawadláwádlaw0@>  # Daily !{adláw-ádlawadláwádlaw}
: a dláwon <@P.LEX.adláwon0@> <@R.LEX.adláwon0@>  # Full daylight after sunrise !{adláwon}
: a dministrasyón <@P.LEX.administrasyón0@> <@R.LEX.administrasyón0@>  # (Sp. administración) Administration !{administrasyón}
: a dóbi <@P.LEX.adóbi0@> <@R.LEX.adóbi0@>  # (Sp. adobe) Mud-bricks !{adóbi}
: a dóbo <@P.LEX.adóbo0@> <@R.LEX.adóbo0@>  # (Sp. adobo) A dish of meat cut up or sliced and mixed with vinegar and various spices !{adóbo}
: a dódos <@P.LEX.adódos0@> <@R.LEX.adódos0@>  # To glide !{adódos}
: a dorasyón <@P.LEX.adorasyón0@> <@R.LEX.adorasyón0@>  # (Sp. adoracion) Adoration !{adorasyón}
: a dórno <@P.LEX.adórno0@> <@R.LEX.adórno0@>  # (Sp. adorno) Adornment !{adórno}
: a ́dtang <@P.LEX.ádtang0@> <@R.LEX.ádtang0@>  # The forehead !{ádtang}
: a ́dto <@P.LEX.ádto0@> <@R.LEX.ádto0@>  # That !{ádto}
: a duána <@P.LEX.aduána0@> <@R.LEX.aduána0@>  # (Sp. aduana) Custom-house !{aduána}
: a dudúlay <@P.LEX.adudúlay0@> <@R.LEX.adudúlay0@>  # A large earth-worm !{adudúlay}
: a ́dyo%^K <@P.LEX.ádyo%^K0@> <@R.LEX.ádyo%^K0@>  # A contr !{ádyò}
: a ́ga <@P.LEX.ága0@> <@R.LEX.ága0@>  # Morning !{ága}
: a gá-ága <@P.LEX.agá-ága0@> <@R.LEX.agá-ága0@>  # Every morning !{agá-ága}
: a ́gad <@P.LEX.ágad0@> <@R.LEX.ágad0@>  # To serve !{ágad}
: a gád <@P.LEX.agád0@> <@R.LEX.agád0@>  # Notwithstanding !{agád}
